Idaho, session 2025, H0111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-211A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-211A. PHOTOGRAPHIC VERIFICATION FOR FEDERAL FOOD STAMP PRO-
GRAM. (1) No later than January 1, 2026, the department of health and welfare
shall:
(a) Add photographic identification to all new electronic benefit
transfer cards issued to recipients. Such photographic identification
electronic benefit transfer cards shall be in a form approved by the de-
partment of health and welfare and may not prevent any authorized users
in the household from accessing benefits;
(b) Develop a strategy to replace all electronic benefit transfer cards
without photographs in circulation within eighteen (18) months for
households that continue to participate in the program; and
(c) Coordinate with the Idaho transportation department and, to the
extent permissible under federal and state law, minimize costs of
implementation by using an individual's photograph or digital image
maintained by the Idaho transportation department for purposes of this
section.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply,
without the consent of the authorized users, to an electronic benefit trans-
fer card issued for a household that:
(a) Does not include any adult members;
(b) In which all of the adult members of the household are sixty (60)
years of age or older;
(c) In which all of the adult members of the household are blind, dis-
abled, or a victim of domestic violence; or
(d) In which all of the adult members of the household have religious
objections to being photographed.
(3) If, within twelve (12) months of a household requesting a replace-
ment electronic benefit transfer card, any member of the household requests
two (2) additional replacement cards, the department shall refer the house-
hold for investigation.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.